Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.180

Unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory rates or charges prohibited.

All rates or charges made for any stockyard services furnished at a public livestock market or special open consignment horse sale shall be just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory, and any unjust, unreasonable, or discriminatory rate or charge is prohibited and declared to be unlawful.

[ 1983 c 298 s 11; 1959 c 107 s 18.]